Maine, session 132, LD279.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 22 MRSA §1717, sub-§2-A, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 309, §5, is amended
to read:
2-A. Licensing of personal care agencies. Beginning July 1, 2024, an entity may not
provide home care services without a personal care agency license issued by the department
in accordance with this section. Beginning November 1, 2025, a parent who is registered
pursuant to section 3174-PPP may provide in-home personal care services in accordance
with section 3174-PPP. All application fees for a license under this section are
nonrefundable and are due upon submission of the application.
A. A personal care agency that holds an unexpired registration issued in accordance
with subsection 2 may continue to provide home care services until the registration
expires.
This paragraph is repealed July 1, 2025.
B. A personal care agency holding an unexpired registration issued in accordance with
subsection 2 is not required to obtain a license until the registration expires.
This paragraph is repealed July 1, 2025.
Sec. 2. 22 MRSA §3174-PPP is enacted to read:
§3174-PPP. In-home personal care services to children
1. Reimbursement for parent. A parent of a child who is eligible for in-home
personal care services under the MaineCare program may register as a personal care
agency, as defined in section 1717, subsection 1, paragraph C and determined in department
rule, and receive reimbursement for providing those services to the child if the following
requirements are met:
A. The parent has made reasonable but unsuccessful efforts to obtain regular in-home
personal care services; and
Page 1 - 132LR0683(01)

B. The parent has satisfied the requirements of the applicable background check
required for providers of in-home personal care services.
2. Employer designation. In order for a parent to be registered as a personal care
agency under subsection 1, another individual who is not a parent of the child must be
designated as the employer. The person designated as the employer must be approved by
both the department and the parent to act in the child's interest.
3. Rulemaking. The department shall adopt rules to implement this section. Rules
adopted pursuant to this subsection are routine technical rules as defined in Title 5, chapter
375, subchapter 2-A.
Sec. 3. Department of Health and Human Services to seek federal
approval. The Department of Health and Human Services shall seek any necessary state
plan amendments or waivers from the United States Department of Health and Human
Services, Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services to implement the Maine Revised
Statutes, Title 22, section 3174-PPP. The department shall submit the requests for approval
no later than 6 months after the effective date of this Act.
Sec. 4. Rulemaking. The Department of Health and Human Services shall adopt
rules in accordance with the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 22, section 3174-PPP,
subsection 3 no later than 6 months after receiving the necessary approvals from the United
States Department of Health and Human Services, Centers for Medicare and Medicaid
Services under section 3.
Sec. 5. Contingent effective date. That section of this Act that amends the Maine
Revised Statutes, Title 22, section 1717, subsection 2-A and enacts Title 22, section
3174-PPP take effect only if the necessary approvals sought pursuant to section 3 of this
Act are received. The Commissioner of Health and Human Services shall notify the
Secretary of State, Secretary of the Senate, Clerk of the House of Representatives and
Revisor of Statutes when approvals sought under section 3 have been received.
Emergency clause. In view of the emergency cited in the preamble, this legislation
takes effect when approved.